District of Columbia statutes.
41-134

Reciprocal actions and agreements.

(a)

At the request of a state, the Corporation Counsel may bring an action in the name of the administrator of the requesting state, in any court of appropriate jurisdiction to enforce the unclaimed property laws of the requesting state against a holder in the District of property subject to escheat or a claim of abandonment by that state, if that state has agreed to pay expenses incurred by the Corporation Counsel in bringing the action.

(b)

The Mayor may request that the attorney general of a state or any other person bring an action in the name of the Mayor in that state. The District government shall pay all expenses including attorney’s fees in any action under this subsection. Any expenses paid pursuant to this subsection may not be deducted from the amount that is subject to the claim by the owner in accordance with this chapter.

(c)

(1)

The Mayor may enter into an agreement to provide and to receive information needed to enable the District government and a state to audit or otherwise determine unclaimed property that the District or the state may be entitled to escheat or subject to a claim of custody as abandoned property.

(2)

The Mayor may by rule require the reporting of information needed to enable the Mayor to comply with agreements made pursuant to this section and prescribe the form, including verification of the information to be reported, and the times for filing the reports.

(d)

The Mayor may join with states to seek enforcement of this chapter against any person who is or may be holding property reportable under this chapter.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 134, 27 DCR 5150
1981 Ed., § 42-234.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 33 of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act (1981 Act).